Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB652.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "dwelling" in section 501 of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 501. Definitions.Subject to additional definitions contained in subsequent provisions of this chapter which are applicable to specific provisions of this chapter, the following words and phrases, when used in this chapter shall have, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the meanings given to them in this section:* * *"Dwelling." [Any building or structure, including any attached porch, deck or patio, though movable or temporary, or a portion thereof, which is for the time being the home or place 123456789101112131415161718 of lodging of the actor.] The parcel of land to the property lines and any building or structure erected thereon, of whatever form, regardless of whether movable or temporary, which is for the time being the home or place of lodging of the actor.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0652PN0663 - 2 - 123456